District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.09

Construction and abolishment.

(a)

To the extent any provision of Chapter 11A of this title [§ 7-1131.01 et seq.], is inconsistent with a provision of this chapter, the provision of this chapter shall govern and shall be deemed to supersede the inconsistent provision.

(b)

The Department of Health Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration as set forth in section IV(A)(3) of Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1996, effective July 17, 1996 (D.C. Official Code, Vol. 3) [Part A of subchapter XIV of Chapter 15 of Title 1], is abolished.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5120, 60 DCR 12472
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5120 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5120 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).